Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 1.1. General Assembly Salaries and Expenses.

§ 30-19.11.
Salaries of Speaker of House of Delegates and members of General Assembly.

The Speaker of the House of Delegates and other members of the General Assembly shall each receive an annual salary as shall be set forth in the general appropriations act. Such salaries shall be payable not more often than biweekly.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 194, § 14.1-17.1; 1976, c. 604; 1984, c. 161; 1998, c. 872.

§ 30-19.12.
Compensation of members of the General Assembly and certain commissions engaged in legislative services.

Subject to the provisions of subsections B through G hereof, members of all legislative committees, legislative commissions, and councils established by the General Assembly and all committees and subcommittees of any of the foregoing shall receive compensation at such rate as provided for in §

2.2-2813

. Any other member of the General Assembly whose attendance, in the opinion of the chairman of such a group, is required at a sitting of such group shall also be entitled to compensation at the same rate.

A legislative member shall not be entitled to compensation pursuant to this section for any services performed on any day that the member’s house is in active session. For purposes of this subsection, “active session” means (i) any day during any regular session of the General Assembly or the first extension thereof, (ii) any day that a roll call vote is taken in the member’s house during any second or subsequent extension of a regular session that is not a pro forma session, or (iii) any day that a roll call vote is taken in the member’s house during any special session of the General Assembly that is not a pro forma session.

A legislative member shall not be entitled to compensation pursuant to this section for legislative services performed on Capitol Square on any day that the member’s house has a pro forma session.

Full-time employees of the Commonwealth or of any of its political subdivisions shall not be entitled to compensation pursuant to this section.

No person shall receive pursuant to this section a total of more than one day’s compensation for services performed on any one day. Whenever a member attends two or more meetings for which compensation is authorized herein in a single day, such one day’s compensation shall be prorated from among the activities served.

Compensation of members of the General Assembly provided for in this section shall be paid by the offices of the Clerk of the House of Delegates or Clerk of the Senate as appropriate and funds therefor transferred from the appropriate activity.

For purposes of this section, “Capitol Square” means the grounds and all buildings in the City of Richmond bounded by Bank, Governor, Broad and Ninth Streets. “Pro forma session” means a session that is announced as a pro forma session by the presiding officer and in which no business is scheduled to be conducted.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-29.1; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-18; 1966, c. 703; 1974, c. 356; 1979, c. 316; 1980, c. 718; 1984, c. 161; 1998, cc. 790, 872; 2006, c. 272.

Cross references.

As to compensation and expenses for members of the Joint Commission on Administrative Rules, see § 30-73.2.

As to membership, terms, compensation and staff of the Virginia Code Commission, see § 30-145.

As to compensation and expenses for members of the Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission, see §

17.1-904

.

Editor’s note.

Effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1998, c. 790, which amended § 14.1-18, the comparable former version of the section.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 272 substituted “B through G” for “B through E” in subsection A; in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “A legislative member” for “Legislative members,” and substituted “member’s house is in active session” for “General Assembly is in session,” and added the last sentence; inserted subsection C; added subsection G; and redesignated former subsections C through E as subsections D through F.

§ 30-19.13.
Additional provisions for expenses of members and presiding officers of General Assembly.

Each member of the General Assembly shall, during any regular session of the General Assembly or extension thereof, or during any special session of the General Assembly, receive for each day as allowances for expenses such sum as shall be set forth in the general appropriation act and mileage allowance at the rate provided in §

2.2-2823

or actual expenses for all official travel. Such mileage or travel reimbursement shall be allowed only for one round trip each week between the City of Richmond and such person’s home.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 240, § 14.1-18.1; 1972, cc. 510, 719; 1974, c. 356; 1975, c. 132; 1984, c. 161; 1998, c. 872.

§ 30-19.14.
Office expenses; taxes and withholding.

Each member of the General Assembly shall receive as an allowance for office expenses and supplies such sums as shall be set forth in the general appropriation act.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, all payments to members of the General Assembly made in accordance with subsection A shall be subject to such taxes and tax withholding as applicable to other nonvouchered allowances, except for any member of the General Assembly who has established an individual “accountable plan” as defined in § 1.62-2(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code Tax Regulations.

History.

1976, c. 735, § 14.1-18.2; 1984, c. 161; 1998, c. 872; 2001, c. 785.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 785, cl. 2 provides: “That this act represents a restatement of current law and practice.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 785, effective March 26, 2001, designated the first paragraph as subsection A; substituted “an allowance” for “reimbursement” in present subsection A; and added subsection B.

§ 30-19.15.
Mileage of members of the General Assembly, legislative committees, etc.

The members of the General Assembly and officers and employees of each house thereof, and members of legislative committees which may sit during any recess of the General Assembly, who are traveling on official business of the Commonwealth, shall be entitled to receive for their mileage such reimbursement as prescribed in §

2.2-2823

for every mile of actual travel.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-30; 1954, c. 709; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-19; 1969, Ex. Sess., c. 4; 1972, cc. 719, 749; 1975, c. 132; 1998, c. 872; 1999, c. 930.

§§ 30-19.16,
30-19.17.
Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 930.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-19.16, which authorized reimbursement for travel expenses of members of General Assembly attending certain meetings, and listed distances between Richmond and courthouses, was derived from Acts 1973, c. 531, § 14.1-19.1; 1978, c. 808; 1998, c. 872.

§ 30-19.18.
How distance ascertained from place other than courthouse.

For the purpose of this chapter and Chapter 1 (§

2.2-100

et seq.) and §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2814

of Title 2.2 only, the distance of the City of Richmond from any place in any county or city other than the courthouse thereof, shall be ascertained by adding to or deducting from the number of miles between the City of Richmond and such courthouse, as declared by law, so many miles as such place may be farther from or nearer to the City of Richmond than such courthouse may be.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-7; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-21; 1998, c. 872.

§ 30-19.19.
Salaries of Clerks of House of Delegates and Senate.

The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Senate shall each receive such salaries as shall be fixed from time to time by the general appropriation act.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-31; 1954, c. 443; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-22; 1998, c. 872.

§ 30-19.20.
Employment and compensation of personnel.

The House of Delegates and the Senate and the clerks thereof are authorized to employ such personnel as may be deemed necessary for the efficient operation of the General Assembly as prescribed by the rules or resolutions of the respective houses.

The House of Delegates and the Senate shall by resolution or resolutions set the compensation of the personnel employed by each house, and the personnel shall be paid from the contingent fund of each house, respectively.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-32; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-23; 1966, c. 703; 1998, c. 872.